Nebraska, session 109, LB1242.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services will
establish and enforce child support obligations of the biological father
of an unborn child and subsequent to the birth of the child to the mother
of such child upon the request of the mother.
(2) The start date for such obligations may begin with the first
month in which the child was conceived, as determined by a physician and
shall begin with that month if the mother so requests.
(3) Payments for such obligations may be retroactively collected or
awarded, including in the case where paternity is established subsequent
to the birth of the child.
(4) The payment amount for such obligations shall be determined by a
court taking into account the best interests of the mother and child.
(5) Any measure to establish the paternity of a child, born or
unborn, shall not be required without the consent of the mother.
(6) Any measure to establish the paternity of an unborn child shall
not be taken if the measure poses any risk of harm to an unborn child.
Sec. 2. Section 43-512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-512 (1) Any dependent child as defined in section 43-504 or any
relative or eligible caretaker of such a dependent child may file with
the Department of Health and Human Services a written application for
financial assistance for such child on forms furnished by the department.
(2) The department, through its agents and employees, shall make
such investigation pursuant to the application as it deems necessary or
as may be required by the county attorney or authorized attorney. If the
investigation or the application for financial assistance discloses that
such child has a parent or stepparent who is able to contribute to the
support of such child and has failed to do so, a copy of the finding of
such investigation and a copy of the application shall immediately be
filed with the county attorney or authorized attorney.
(3) The department shall make a finding as to whether the
-2-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
application referred to in subsection (1) of this section should be
allowed or denied. If the department finds that the application should be
allowed, the department shall further find the amount of monthly
assistance which should be paid with reference to such dependent child.
Except as may be otherwise provided, payments shall be made by unit size
and shall be consistent with subdivisions (1)(p), (1)(q), (1)(t), (1)(u),
and (1)(v) of section 68-1713. Beginning on August 30, 2015, the maximum
payment level for monthly assistance shall be fifty-five percent of the
standard of need described in section 43-513.
No payments shall be made for amounts totaling less than ten dollars
per month except in the recovery of overpayments.
(4) The amount which shall be paid as assistance with respect to a
dependent child shall be based in each case upon the conditions disclosed
by the investigation made by the department. An appeal shall lie from the
finding made in each case to the chief executive officer of the
department or his or her designated representative. Such appeal may be
taken by any taxpayer or by any relative of such child. Proceedings for
and upon appeal shall be conducted in the same manner as provided for in
section 68-1016.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preventing dependency, the department
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for services
to former and potential recipients of aid to dependent children and
medical assistance benefits. The department shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations establishing programs and cooperating with programs
of work incentive, work experience, job training, and education. The
provisions of this section with regard to determination of need, amount
of payment, maximum payment, and method of payment shall not be
applicable to families or children included in such programs. Income and
assets described in section 68-1201 shall not be included in
determination of need under this section.
(b) If a recipient of aid to dependent children becomes ineligible
-3-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
for aid to dependent children as a result of increased hours of
employment or increased income from employment after having participated
in any of the programs established pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection, the recipient may be eligible for the following benefits, as
provided in rules and regulations of the department in accordance with
sections 402, 417, and 1925 of the federal Social Security Act, as
amended, Public Law 100-485, in order to help the family during the
transition from public assistance to independence:
(i) An ongoing transitional payment that is intended to meet the
family's ongoing basic needs which may include food, clothing, shelter,
utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general incidental
expenses during the five months following the time the family becomes
ineligible for assistance under the aid to dependent children program, if
the family's earned income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent
of the federal poverty level at the time the family becomes ineligible
for the aid to dependent children program. Payments shall be made in five
monthly payments, each equal to one-fifth of the aid to dependent
children payment standard for the family's size at the time the family
becomes ineligible for the aid to dependent children program. If during
the five-month period, (A) the family's earnings exceed one hundred
eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level, (B) the family members
are no longer working, (C) the family ceases to be Nebraska residents,
(D) there is no longer a minor child in the family's household, or (E)
the family again becomes eligible for the aid to dependent children
program, the family shall become ineligible for any remaining
transitional benefits under this subdivision;
(ii) Child care as provided in subdivision (1)(c) of section
68-1724; and
(iii) Except as may be provided in accordance with subsection (2) of
section 68-1713 and subdivision (1)(c) of section 68-1724, medical
assistance for up to twelve months after the month the recipient becomes
-4-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
employed and is no longer eligible for aid to dependent children.
(6) For purposes of sections 43-512 to 43-512.18 and section 1 of
this act:
(a) Authorized attorney shall mean an attorney, employed by the
county subject to the approval of the county board, employed by the
department, or appointed by the court, who is authorized to investigate
and prosecute child, spousal, and medical support cases. An authorized
attorney shall represent the state as provided in section 43-512.03;
(b) Child support shall be defined as provided in section 43-1705;
(c) Medical support shall include all expenses associated with the
birth of a child, cash medical support as defined in section 42-369,
health care coverage as defined in section 44-3,144, and medical and
hospital insurance coverage or membership in a health maintenance
organization or preferred provider organization;
(d) Spousal support shall be defined as provided in section 43-1715;
(e) State Disbursement Unit shall be defined as provided in section
43-3341; and
(f) Support shall be defined as provided in section 43-3313; and .
(g) Unborn child shall mean an individual member of the species Homo
sapiens at any stage of development in utero.
Sec. 3. Section 43-512.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-512.02 (1)(a) (1) Any child or any relative, lawful custodian,
guardian, or next friend of a child may file with the county attorney,
authorized attorney, or other office designated by the Department of
Health and Human Services an application for the same child, spousal, and
medical support collection or paternity determination services as are
provided to dependent children and their relatives under sections 43-512
to 43-512.10 by the department, the county attorney, the authorized
attorney, and the clerk of the district court.
(b) The mother of an unborn child may file with the county attorney,
-5-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
authorized attorney, or other office designated by the Department of
Health and Human Services an application for the establishment and
enforcement of a child support order as provided for in sections 43-512
to 43-512.10 and section 1 of this act.
(2) If an office other than the office of the county attorney or
authorized attorney is authorized by the department to accept such
applications and if the application discloses that such child has a
parent or stepparent who is able to contribute to the support of such
child and has failed to do so, a copy of the application shall
immediately be filed with the county attorney or authorized attorney.
(3)(a) The department shall determine an application fee to be
charged to each individual who applies for services available in this
section which shall not exceed the fee amount allowed by Title IV-D of
the federal Social Security Act, as amended. The fee shall be collected
from the individual or paid by the department on the individual's behalf.
The county attorney or authorized attorney may recover the fee from the
parent or stepparent who owes child, spousal, or medical support and
reimburse the applicant. The governmental entity which is actually
collecting the delinquent support payments shall collect the fee and send
it to the department.
(b) The department may establish a schedule of amounts to be charged
to recover any costs incurred in excess of any fees collected to cover
administrative costs of providing the full scope of services required by
state law. The department shall by regulation establish a schedule of
amounts to be paid for such services based upon the actual costs incurred
in providing such services. The schedule shall be made available to all
applicants for such services. Any amount charged to recover costs may be
collected from the parent or stepparent who owes child, spousal, or
medical support or from the individual who has applied for enforcement
services, either directly from such individual or from the child or
spousal support collected, but only if the individual has been notified
-6-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
that the county attorney or authorized attorney will recover costs from
an individual who receives enforcement services. The department shall not
impose an application fee for services in any case in which the
department is authorized to continue to collect and distribute support
payments after a family ceases to receive aid to dependent children
payments.
Sec. 4. Section 43-512.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-512.03 (1) The county attorney or authorized attorney shall:
(a) On request by the Department of Health and Human Services as
described in subsection (2) of this section or when the investigation or
application filed under section 43-512 or 43-512.02 justifies, file a
complaint against a nonsupporting party in the district, county, or
separate juvenile court praying for an order for child or medical support
in cases when there is no existing child or medical support order. After
notice and hearing, the court shall adjudicate the child and medical
support liability of either party and enter an order accordingly;
(b) Enforce child, spousal, and medical support orders by an action
for income withholding pursuant to the Income Withholding for Child
Support Act;
(c) In addition to income withholding, enforce child, spousal, and
medical support orders by other civil actions or administrative actions,
citing the defendant for contempt, or filing a criminal complaint;
(d) Establish paternity and collect child and medical support on
behalf of children born out of wedlock; and
(e) Carry out sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.18.
(2) The department may periodically review cases of individuals
receiving enforcement services and make referrals to the county attorney
or authorized attorney.
(3) In any action brought by or intervened in by a county attorney
or authorized attorney under the Income Withholding for Child Support
-7-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
Act, the License Suspension Act, the Uniform Interstate Family Support
Act, or sections 42-347 to 42-381, 43-290, 43-512 to 43-512.18 and
section 1 of this act, 43-1401 to 43-1418, and 43-3328 to 43-3339, such
attorneys shall represent the State of Nebraska.
(4) The State of Nebraska shall be a real party in interest in any
action brought by or intervened in by a county attorney or authorized
attorney for the purpose of establishing paternity or securing,
modifying, suspending, or terminating child or medical support or in any
action brought by or intervened in by a county attorney or authorized
attorney to enforce an order for child, spousal, or medical support.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interpret
representation by a county attorney or an authorized attorney as creating
an attorney-client relationship between the county attorney or authorized
attorney and any party or witness to the action, other than the State of
Nebraska, regardless of the name in which the action is brought.
Sec. 5. Section 43-512.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-512.05 (1) It shall be the duty of the clerks of the district
courts to furnish the Department of Health and Human Services monthly
statistical information and any other information required by the
department to properly account for child, spousal, and medical support
payments. The clerk of each district court shall negotiate and enter into
a written agreement with the department in order to receive reimbursement
for the costs incurred in carrying out sections 43-512 to 43-512.10 and
43-512.12 to 43-512.18 and section 1 of this act.
(2) The department and the governing board of the county, county
attorney, or authorized attorney may enter into a written agreement
regarding the determination of paternity and child, spousal, and medical
support enforcement for the purpose of implementing such sections.
Paternity shall be established when it can be determined that the
collection of child support is feasible.
-8-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
(3) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
regarding the rate and manner of reimbursement for costs incurred in
carrying out such sections, taking into account relevant federal law,
available federal funds, and any appropriations made by the Legislature.
Any reimbursement funds shall be added to the budgets of those county
officials who have performed the services as called for in the
cooperative agreements and carried over from year to year as required by
law.
Sec. 6. Section 43-512.10, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-512.10 Sections 43-512 to 43-512.10 and 43-512.12 to 43-512.18
and section 1 of this act shall be interpreted so as to facilitate the
determination of paternity, child, spousal, and medical support
enforcement, and the conduct of reviews under such sections.
Sec. 7. Section 43-2924, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-2924 (1) The Parenting Act shall apply to proceedings or
modifications filed on or after January 1, 2008, in which parenting
functions for a child are at issue (a) under Chapter 42, including, but
not limited to, proceedings or modification of orders for dissolution of
marriage and child custody and (b) under sections 43-1401 to 43-1418. The
Parenting Act may apply to proceedings or modifications in which
parenting functions for a child are at issue under Chapter 30 or 43. The
Parenting Act shall also apply to subsequent modifications of bridge
orders entered under section 43-246.02 by a separate juvenile court or
county court sitting as a juvenile court and docketed in a district
court.
(2) The Parenting Act does not apply in any action filed by a county
attorney or authorized attorney pursuant to his or her duties under
section 42-358, 43-512 to 43-512.18 and section 1 of this act, or 43-1401
to 43-1418, the Income Withholding for Child Support Act, the Revised
-9-

LB1242 LB1242
2026 2026
Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act before January 1, 1994, or
the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act for purposes of the
establishment of paternity and the establishment and enforcement of child
and medical support or a bridge order entered under section 43-246.02 by
a separate juvenile court or county court sitting as a juvenile court and
docketed in a district court. A county attorney or authorized attorney
shall not participate in the development of or court review of a
parenting plan under the Parenting Act. If both parents are parties to a
paternity or support action filed by a county attorney or authorized
attorney, the parents may proceed with a parenting plan.
Sec. 8. Original sections 43-512.02, 43-512.03, 43-512.05, and
43-512.10, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 43-512 and
43-2924, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-10-